Maryland, session 2025, HB1418.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
12–113.
(a) The Office of the Attorney General, the State Lottery and Gaming Control
Commission, the Department of State Police, local law enforcement units, and the court
shall construe liberally this title relating to gambling and betting to prevent the activities
prohibited.
(b) GAMBLING AND BETTING ACTIVITIES THAT ARE OFFERED OR
CONDUCTED ONLINE IN THE STATE ARE PROHIBITED, EXCEPT AS:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1418*

HOUSE BILL 1418
(1) PROVIDED UNDER TITLE 9, SUBTITLES 1D AND IE OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE; OR
(2) AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS ARTICLE.
(C) A decision by the State Lottery and Gaming Control Commission shall be the
final determination as to whether a gaming device being operated in the State is:
(1) a legal gaming device or device consistent with the provisions of this
article; and
(2) being operated in a lawful manner under this article.
[(c)] (D) If a local law enforcement unit fails to promptly enforce a final
determination made under subsection [(b)] (C) of this section, the State Lottery and
Gaming Control Commission shall refer the matter to the Department of State Police for
enforcement of the law.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before January 1, 2026,
the State Lottery and Gaming Control Commission shall report to the Senate Budget and
Taxation Committee and the House Appropriations Committee and Ways and Means
Committee, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, on:
(1) the number of illegal online gaming platforms that can be accessed by
State residents;
(2) the amount of wagers being placed by individuals in the State using
illegal online gaming platforms;
(3) the means by which individuals in the State are able to access illegal
online gaming platforms;
(4) the means by which illegal online gaming operators are marketing to
individuals in the State;
(5) the manner in which individuals in the State are able to place wagers
through illegal online gaming platforms; and
(6) actions that are available to block access to illegal online gaming
platforms by individuals in the State, as well as compliance and enforcement measures that
the Commission may employ to cease operations of illegal online gaming platforms in the
State.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.